Illinois, session 104th, HB5790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Partners for 6Conservation Fund to the Department of Agriculture for grants 7to Soil and Water Conservation Districts for ordinary and 8contingent administrative expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.